New Mexico, session 2026, HB181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the children, youth and families department for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 to report on a weekly basis to the office of child advocate and on a monthly basis to the appropriate interim committee dealing with courts, corrections and justice, the legislative health and human services committee and the legislative finance committee regarding the total number of children in the custody of the children, youth and families department who have been required to stay overnight in an office, including the reasons for the stay, the duration of the stay and the current status or resolution of the placement. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -